District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Posthumous Care Modernization Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 3 of the District of Columbia Funeral Services Regulatory Act of 1984,
effective May 22, 1984 (D.C. Law 5-84; D.C. Official Code § 3-402), is amended as follows:
(a) A new paragraph (1A) is added to read as follows:
“(1A) “Alkaline Hydrolysis” means the process of reducing human remains using
water, alkaline chemicals, and heat inside a watertight vessel to accelerate decomposition at a
funeral services establishment.”.
(b) A new paragraph (5A) is added to read as follows:
“(5A) “Cremation” means the disposition of a dead human body by means of
incineration.”.
(c) Paragraph (11) is amended by striking the phrase “burial, cremation,” and inserting
the phrase “burial, cremation, alkaline hydrolysis,” in its place.
Sec. 3. Title I of the Vital Records Modernization Amendment Act of 2018, effective
October 30, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-164; D.C. Official Code § 7-231.01 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 101 (D.C. Official Code § 7-231.01) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is redesignated as paragraph (1A).
(2) A new paragraph (1) is added to read as follows:
“(1) “Alkaline hydrolysis” shall have the same meaning as provided in section
3(1A) of the District of Columbia Funeral Services Regulatory Act of 1984, effective May 22,
1984 (D.C. Law 5-84; D.C. Official Code § 3-402(1A)).”.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(3) Paragraph (30) is amended by striking the phrase “human ashes recovered
after cremation.” and inserting the phrase “the product of cremation or alkaline hydrolysis.” in its
place.
(4) Paragraph (50) is repealed.
(b) Section 105(d) (D.C. Official Code § 7-231.05(d)) is amended by striking the phrase
“or cremation” and inserting the phrase “cremation, or alkaline hydrolysis” in its place.
(c) Section 117(a)(4) (D.C. Official Code § 7-231.17(a)(4)) is amended by striking the
word “resomation” and inserting the phrase “alkaline hydrolysis” in its place.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of Congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Code § 1-206(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2